Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.341

Withdrawal of registration.

A foreign limited liability company may withdraw its registration by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of withdrawal in accordance with RCW 23.95.530.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7121; 2015 c 188 s 67.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.